Nebraska, session 109, LB134.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-3,113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-3,113 (1) The department shall, without the payment of any fee
except the taxes and fees required by sections 60-3,102, 60-3,185,
60-3,190, and 60-3,191, issue license plates for one motor vehicle not
used for hire and a license plate for one autocycle or motorcycle not
used for hire to:
(a) Any permanently handicapped or disabled person or his or her
parent, legal guardian, foster parent, or agent upon application and
proof of a permanent handicap or disability; or
(b) A trust that which owns the motor vehicle, autocycle, or
motorcycle if a designated beneficiary of the trust qualifies under
subdivision (a) of this subsection.
(2) An application and proof of disability in the form and with the
information required by section 60-3,113.02 shall be submitted before
such license plates are issued or reissued.
(3) (2) The license plate or plates shall carry the internationally
accepted wheelchair symbol, which symbol is a representation of a person
seated in a wheelchair surrounded by a border six units wide by seven
units high, and such other letters or numbers as the director prescribes.
Such license plate or plates shall be used by such person in lieu of any
other the usual license plate or plates.
(4) (3) The department shall compile and maintain a registry of the
names, addresses, and license numbers of all persons who obtain license
plates with the internationally accepted wheelchair symbol pursuant to
this section and sections 60-3,122.03, 60-3,122.04, 60-3,124, and
60-3,125 special license plates pursuant to this section and all persons
who obtain a handicapped or disabled parking permit.
Sec. 2. Section 60-3,122.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,122.03 (1) The department shall design license plates to be
-2-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
known as Military Honor Plates.
(2)(a) (2) The department shall create designs honoring persons who
have served or are serving in the United States Army, United States Army
Reserve, United States Navy, United States Navy Reserve, United States
Marine Corps, United States Marine Corps Reserve, United States Coast
Guard, United States Coast Guard Reserve, United States Air Force, United
States Air Force Reserve, United States Space Force, Air National Guard,
or Army National Guard.
(b) The department may begin issuing the license plates with the
design honoring persons who have served or are serving in the United
States Space Force on January 1, 2026.
(3) There shall be thirteen twelve such designs, one for each of
such armed forces reflecting its official emblem, official seal, or other
official image. The issuance of plates for each of such armed forces
shall be conditioned on the approval of the armed forces owning the
copyright to the official emblem, official seal, or other official image.
(4) The department shall create six five additional designs honoring
persons who are serving or have served in the armed forces of the United
States and who have been awarded the Afghanistan Campaign Medal, Iraq
Campaign Medal, Global War on Terrorism Expeditionary Medal, Southwest
Asia Service Medal, or Vietnam Service Medal, or Inherent Resolve
Campaign Medal.
(5) The department shall create the following additional designs
honoring persons who are serving or have served in the armed forces of
the United States and may begin issuing such license plates on January 1,
2026:
(a) One design that includes the word "veteran"; and
(b) One design that includes the word "veteran" and the
internationally accepted wheelchair symbol specified in section 60-3,113.
(6)(a) (5) A person may qualify for a Military Honor Plate by
registering with the Department of Veterans' Affairs pursuant to section
-3-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
80-414. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall verify the applicant's
eligibility for a plate created pursuant to this section by consulting
the registry established by the Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(b) To be eligible for the license plates described in subdivision
(5)(b) of this section, in addition to any other eligibility requirements
for such license plates under this section:
(i) An application and proof of disability in the form and with the
information required by section 60-3,113.02 shall be submitted before
issuance or reissuance of such license plates; and
(ii) The handicap or disability of the handicapped or disabled
person shall be certified as permanent.
(7) (6) The design shall be selected on the basis of limiting the
manufacturing cost of each plate to an amount less than or equal to the
amount charged for license plates pursuant to section 60-3,102. The
Department of Motor Vehicles shall make applications available for each
type of plate when it is designed. The department may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section and section
60-3,122.04.
(8) (7) One type of Military Honor Plates shall be alphanumeric
plates. The department shall:
(a) Assign a designation up to five characters; and
(b) Not use a county designation.
(9) (8) One type of Military Honor Plates shall be personalized
message plates. Such plates shall be issued subject to the same
conditions specified for personalized message license plates in section
60-3,118, except that a maximum of five characters may be used.
(10) (9) The department shall cease to issue Military Honor Plates
beginning with the next license plate issuance cycle after the license
plate issuance cycle that begins in 2023 pursuant to section 60-3,101 if
the total number of registered vehicles that obtained such plates is less
than one five hundred per year within any prior consecutive two-year
-4-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
period.
Sec. 3. Section 60-3,122.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-3,122.04 (1)(a) (1) An eligible person may apply to the
department for Military Honor Plates in lieu of regular license plates on
an application prescribed and provided by the department for any motor
vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, except for a motor vehicle or trailer
registered under section 60-3,198. An applicant receiving a Military
Honor Plate for a farm truck with a gross weight of over sixteen tons
shall affix the appropriate tonnage decal to the plate.
(b) The department shall make forms available for such applications
through the county treasurers.
(c) The license plates shall be issued upon payment of the license
fee described in subsection (2) of this section and verification by the
department of an applicant's eligibility using the registry established
by the Department of Veterans' Affairs pursuant to section 80-414. To be
eligible an applicant shall be:
(i) Active (a) active duty or reserve duty armed forces personnel
serving in any of the armed forces listed in subsection (2) of section
60-3,122.03 or , (b) a veteran of any of such armed forces who was
discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or
general (under honorable conditions);
(ii) A , (c) a current or former commissioned officer of the United
States Public Health Service or National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration who has been detailed directly to any branch of such armed
forces for service on active or reserve duty and who was discharged or
otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or general
(under honorable conditions) as proven with valid orders from the United
States Department of Defense, a statement of service provided by the
United States Public Health Service, or a report of transfer or discharge
provided by the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration;
-5-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
(iii) A , or (d) a person who is serving or has served in the armed
forces of the United States and who has been awarded the Afghanistan
Campaign Medal, Iraq Campaign Medal, Global War on Terrorism
Expeditionary Medal, Southwest Asia Service Medal, or Vietnam Service
Medal; .
(iv) For the license plate described in subdivision (5)(a) of
section 60-3,122.03, a person who is serving or has served in the armed
forces of the United States;
(v) For the license plate described in subdivision (5)(b) of section
60-3,122.03, a person who is serving or has served in the armed forces of
the United States and is permanently handicapped or disabled; or
(vi) Beginning January 1, 2026, a trust that owns the motor vehicle,
trailer, or semitrailer if a designated beneficiary of the trust
qualifies under subdivision (1)(c) of this section.
(d) Any person using Military Honor Plates shall surrender the
plates to the county treasurer if such person is no longer eligible for
the plates. Regular plates shall be issued to any such person upon
surrender of the Military Honor Plates for a three-dollar transfer fee
and forfeiture of any of the remaining annual fee. The three-dollar
transfer fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(2)(a) In addition to all other fees required for registration under
the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, each application for initial issuance
or renewal of alphanumeric Military Honor Plates shall be accompanied by
a fee of five dollars. County treasurers collecting fees pursuant to this
subdivision shall remit them to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer
shall credit five dollars of the fee to the Nebraska Veteran Cemetery
System Operation Fund.
(b) In addition to all other fees required for registration under
the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, each application for initial issuance
or renewal of personalized message Military Honor Plates shall be
-6-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
accompanied by a fee of forty dollars. County treasurers collecting fees
pursuant to this subdivision shall remit them to the State Treasurer. The
State Treasurer shall credit twenty-five percent of the fee for initial
issuance and renewal of such plates to the Department of Motor Vehicles
Cash Fund and seventy-five percent of the fee to the Nebraska Veteran
Cemetery System Operation Fund.
(3)(a) When the department receives an application for Military
Honor Plates, the department may deliver the plates and registration
certificate to the applicant by United States mail or to the county
treasurer of the county in which the motor vehicle or trailer is
registered and the delivery of the plates and registration certificate
shall be made through a secure process and system. If Beginning on an
implementation date designated by the director on or before January 1,
2022, if delivery of the plates and registration certificate is made by
the department to the applicant, the department may charge a postage and
handling fee in an amount not more than necessary to recover the cost of
postage and handling for the specific items mailed to the registrant. The
department shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. The county treasurer or the
department shall issue Military Honor Plates in lieu of regular license
plates when the applicant complies with the other provisions of the Motor
Vehicle Registration Act for registration of the motor vehicle or
trailer. If Military Honor Plates are lost, stolen, or mutilated, the
licensee shall be issued replacement license plates upon request pursuant
to section 60-3,157.
(b) The county treasurer or the department may issue temporary
license stickers to the applicant under this section for the applicant to
lawfully operate the vehicle pending receipt of the license plates. No
charge in addition to the registration fee shall be made for the issuance
of a temporary license sticker under this subdivision. The department
shall furnish temporary license stickers for issuance by the county
-7-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
treasurer at no cost to the counties. The department may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations regarding the design and issuance of
temporary license stickers.
(4) The owner of a motor vehicle or trailer bearing Military Honor
Plates may apply to the county treasurer to have such plates transferred
to a motor vehicle or trailer other than the motor vehicle or trailer for
which such plates were originally purchased if such motor vehicle or
trailer is owned by the owner of the plates. The owner may have the
unused portion of the fee for the plates credited to the other motor
vehicle or trailer which will bear the plates at the rate of eight and
one-third percent per month for each full month left in the registration
period. Application for such transfer shall be accompanied by a fee of
three dollars. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor
Vehicles Cash Fund.
(5) If the cost of manufacturing Military Honor Plates at any time
exceeds the amount charged for license plates pursuant to section
60-3,102, any money to be credited to the Nebraska Veteran Cemetery
System Operation Fund shall instead be credited first to the Highway
Trust Fund in an amount equal to the difference between the manufacturing
costs of Military Honor Plates and the amount charged pursuant to section
60-3,102 with respect to such plates and the remainder shall be credited
to the Nebraska Veteran Cemetery System Operation Fund.
(6) If the director discovers evidence of fraud in an application
for Military Honor Plates or that the holder is no longer eligible to
have Military Honor Plates, the director may summarily cancel the plates
and registration and send notice of the cancellation to the holder of the
license plates.
Sec. 4. Section 60-3,123, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,123 (1) Any person who was captured and incarcerated by an
-8-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
enemy of the United States during a period of conflict with such enemy
and who was discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of
honorable from or is currently serving in the United States Armed Forces
may, in addition to the application required in section 60-385, apply to
the department for license plates designed to indicate that he or she is
a former prisoner of war.
(2) In order to be eligible for license plates under this section, a
person shall register with the Department of Veterans' Affairs pursuant
to section 80-414. The license plates shall be issued upon the applicant
paying the license plate fee as provided in subsection (3) of this
section and verification by the Department of Motor Vehicles of an
applicant's eligibility using the registry established by the Department
of Veterans' Affairs pursuant to section 80-414. Any number of motor
vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers owned by the applicant may be so
licensed at any one time. Motor vehicles and trailers registered under
section 60-3,198 shall not be so licensed.
(3) No license plate fee shall be required for license plates under
this section.
(4) If the license plates issued under this section are lost,
stolen, or mutilated, the recipient of the license plates shall be issued
replacement license plates upon request and without charge.
(5) License plates issued under this section shall not require the
payment of any additional license plate fees and shall be permanently
attached to the vehicle to which the plates are registered as long as the
vehicle is properly registered by the applicant annually.
(6) The county treasurer or the department may issue temporary
license stickers to the applicant under this section for the applicant to
lawfully operate the vehicle pending receipt of the license plates. No
charge in addition to the registration fee shall be made for the issuance
of a temporary license sticker under this subsection. The department
shall furnish temporary license stickers for issuance by the county
-9-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
treasurer at no cost to the counties. The department may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations regarding the design and issuance of
temporary license stickers.
Sec. 5. Section 60-3,124, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,124 (1)(a)(i) Before January 1, 2026, any (1) Any person who is
a veteran of the United States Armed Forces, who was discharged or
otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or general
(under honorable conditions), and who is classified by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs as at least ten one hundred percent
service-connected disabled may, in addition to the application required
in section 60-385, apply to the Department of Motor Vehicles for license
plates designed by the department to indicate that the applicant is a
disabled veteran. The inscription on the license plates shall be D.A.V.
immediately below the license plate number to indicate that the holder of
the license plates is a disabled veteran.
(ii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, when renewing the registration
for a license plate described in subdivision (1)(a)(i) of this section,
the department shall issue the license plates described in subdivision
(1)(b)(i) of this section along with any required validation decals. The
license plates described in subdivision (1)(a)(i) of this section shall
not be valid for use on any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer
beginning on February 1, 2027.
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2026, any person who is a veteran of the
United States Armed Forces, who was discharged or otherwise separated
with a characterization of honorable or general (under honorable
conditions), and who is classified by the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs as at least ten percent service-connected disabled may,
in addition to the application required in section 60-385, apply to the
Department of Motor Vehicles for license plates designed by the
department:
-10-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
(i) With the words "disabled veteran" immediately below the license
plate number; or
(ii) With the words "disabled veteran" immediately below the license
plate number and also carrying the internationally accepted wheelchair
symbol specified in section 60-3,113.
(iii) Beginning January 1, 2026, a trust that owns a motor vehicle,
trailer, or semitrailer may apply for the license plates described in
subdivision (1)(b)(i) or (ii) of this section if a designated beneficiary
of the trust qualifies for such license plates.
(2)(a) To (2) In order to be eligible for license plates under this
section, a person shall register with the Department of Veterans' Affairs
pursuant to section 80-414. The plates shall be issued upon the applicant
paying the license plate fee as provided in subsection (3) of this
section and verification by the Department of Motor Vehicles shall verify
of an applicant's eligibility using the registry established by the
Department of Veterans' Affairs pursuant to section 80-414 prior to
issuing any license plates under this section.
(b) To be eligible for the license plates described in subdivision
(1)(b)(ii) of this section, in addition to any other eligibility
requirements for such license plates under this section:
(i) An application and proof of disability in the form and with the
information required by section 60-3,113.02 shall be submitted before
issuance or reissuance of such license plates; and
(ii) The handicap or disability of the handicapped or disabled
person shall be certified as permanent.
(c) Any number of motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers owned by
the applicant may be so licensed at any one time. Motor vehicles and
trailers registered under section 60-3,198 shall not be so licensed.
(3) No license plate fee shall be required for license plates under
this section.
(4) If the license plates issued under this section are lost,
-11-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
stolen, or mutilated, the recipient of the plates shall be issued
replacement license plates as provided in section 60-3,157.
(5) License plates issued under this section shall not require the
payment of any additional license plate fees and shall be permanently
attached to the vehicle to which the plates are registered as long as the
vehicle is properly registered by the applicant annually.
(6) The county treasurer or the department may issue temporary
license stickers to the applicant under this section for the applicant to
lawfully operate the vehicle pending receipt of the license plates. No
charge in addition to the registration fee shall be made for the issuance
of a temporary license sticker under this subsection. The department
shall furnish temporary license stickers for issuance by the county
treasurer at no cost to the counties. The department may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations regarding the design and issuance of
temporary license stickers.
Sec. 6. Section 60-3,125, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,125 (1)(a) (1) Any person may, in addition to the application
required by section 60-385, apply to the department for license plates
designed by the department to indicate that the applicant has received
from the federal government an award of a Purple Heart. The inscription
of the plates shall be designed so as to include a facsimile of the award
and beneath any numerical designation upon the plates pursuant to section
60-370 the words Purple Heart separately on one line and the words Combat
Wounded on the line below.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2026, any person may, in addition to the
application required by section 60-385, apply to the department for
license plates designed by the department to indicate that the applicant
has received from the federal government an award of a Purple Heart. The
inscription of the plates shall be designed so as to include a facsimile
of the award and beneath any numerical designation upon the plates
-12-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
pursuant to section 60-370 the words Purple Heart separately on one line
and the words Combat Wounded on the line below. Such license plates shall
also carry the internationally accepted wheelchair symbol specified in
section 60-3,113.
(c) Beginning January 1, 2026, a trust that owns a motor vehicle,
trailer, or semitrailer may apply for the license plates described in
subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of this section if a designated beneficiary of
the trust qualifies for such license plates.
(2)(a) To (2) In order to be eligible for license plates under this
section, a person shall register with the Department of Veterans' Affairs
pursuant to section 80-414. The license plates shall be issued upon
payment of the license plate fee as provided in subsection (3) of this
section and verification by the Department of Motor Vehicles shall verify
of an applicant's eligibility using the registry established by the
Department of Veterans' Affairs pursuant to section 80-414 prior to
issuing any license plates under this section.
(b) To be eligible for the license plates described in subdivision
(1)(b) of this section, in addition to any other eligibility requirements
for such license plates under this section:
(i) An application and proof of disability in the form and with the
information required by section 60-3,113.02 shall be submitted before
issuance or reissuance of such license plates; and
(ii) The handicap or disability of the handicapped or disabled
person shall be certified as permanent.
(c) Any number of motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers owned by
the applicant may be so licensed at any one time. Motor vehicles and
trailers registered under section 60-3,198 shall not be so licensed.
(3) No license plate fee shall be required for license plates under
this section.
(4) If license plates issued pursuant to this section are lost,
stolen, or mutilated, the recipient of the plates shall be issued
-13-

LB134 LB134
2025 2025
replacement license plates upon request and without charge.
(5) License plates issued under this section shall not require the
payment of any additional license plate fees and shall be permanently
attached to the vehicle to which the plates are registered as long as the
vehicle is properly registered by the applicant annually.
(6) The county treasurer or the department may issue temporary
license stickers to the applicant under this section for the applicant to
lawfully operate the vehicle pending receipt of the license plates. No
charge in addition to the registration fee shall be made for the issuance
of a temporary license sticker under this subsection. The department
shall furnish temporary license stickers for issuance by the county
treasurer at no cost to the counties. The department may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations regarding the design and issuance of
temporary license stickers.
Sec. 7. Original sections 60-3,113 and 60-3,122.04, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 60-3,122.03, 60-3,123, 60-3,124, and
60-3,125, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-14-